Louisiana, session 2026, HB568.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:981.3(D) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
40:981.3(A)(4) and (E) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§981.3. Violation of Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Law; drug free
zone
A.
* * *
(4) Any person who violates a provision of R.S. 40:966 through 970 of the
Uniform Controlled Dangerous Substances Law while smoking, vaping, or otherwise
abusing such controlled dangerous substance while on any property used for school
purposes by any school, within two thousand feet of any such property, or while on
a school bus, shall, upon conviction, be punished in accordance with Subsection D
of this Section.
* * *
D.(1) Whoever Except as provided in Subsection E of this Section, whoever
violates a provision of this Section shall be punished by the imposition of the
maximum fine and be imprisoned for not more than one and one-half times the
longest term of imprisonment authorized by the applicable provisions of R.S. 40:966
through 970.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 568 ENROLLED
(2) A Except as provided in Subsection E of this Section, a sentence imposed
for a violation of the provisions of this Section shall not be subject to parole,
probation, or suspension of sentence to the extent that the minimum sentence for a
violation of a felony provision of R.S. 40:966 through 970 is not subject to parole,
probation, or suspension of sentence.
E. Notwithstanding Subsection D of this Section, whoever violates a
provision of this Section by committing an act which also constitutes a violation of
R.S. 40:966(C)(2) shall be punished by imprisonment, with or without hard labor,
for not more than one year and may, in addition, be required to pay a fine of not
more than one thousand dollars.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.